California, session 20252026, SB1049.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1371.21 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1371.21. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if a health care service plan denies a claim or sends a notice of overpayment for a claim based in whole or in part on a defect that may be remedied by submitting a corrected claim, the provider shall have 90 days from the plan’s most recent action to submit a corrected claim. A(b) A plan shall not deny a corrected claim submitted pursuant to this section and in accordance with subdivision (a) on the grounds that the provider did not submit the claim within the an applicable claim filing deadline. deadline other than the deadline specified in subdivision (a).SEC. 2. Section 10123.134 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10123.134. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if a health insurer denies a claim or sends a notice of overpayment for a claim based in whole or in part on a defect that may be remedied by submitting a corrected claim, the provider shall have 90 days from the insurer’s most recent action to submit a corrected claim. An(b) An insurer shall not deny a corrected claim submitted pursuant to this section and in accordance with subdivision (a) on the grounds that the provider did not submit the claim within the an applicable claim filing deadline. deadline other than the deadline specified in subdivision (a).SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________